Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1605
Alterations, defined.

Alterations means alterations to an existing dam that directly affect the safety of the dam or reservoir, as determined by the Chief Water Officer, but does not include maintenance and repair of the dam to retain its initial structural integrity.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 271.